Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2006
State patrol; patrolling highways; cooperation; duties; extension to freeways.

The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety through his or her subordinate officers or employees in the Nebraska State Patrol shall properly patrol the highways of this state and cooperate with sheriffs, police officers, or other peace officers in enforcing the laws regulating the registration, operation, and use of vehicles upon the highway, including the specific enforcement of maximum speed limits. Performance of all duties, powers, and exercise of jurisdiction of the Nebraska State Patrol shall extend to all freeways as defined in section 60-621 or any part thereof which is located within the jurisdictional limits of local authority. Officers and employees of the patrol shall cooperate with sheriffs, police officers, or any other local peace officers, and such officers will share concurrent jurisdiction with the patrol concerning any such freeway within local limits.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 8, p. 509;

Laws 1941, c. 176, § 10, p. 693;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-423;

R.S.1943, § 60-437;

Laws 1961, c. 184, § 36, p. 567;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-437;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 491;

Laws 1996, LB 901, § 12.

This section does not furnish a foundation for an order by an officer to a person not under arrest to follow the officer. State v. Embrey, 188 Neb. 649, 198 N.W.2d 322 (1972).